apertium-umu.umu.twol
Alphabet
A À Á B C D E È É F G H I Ì Í Ĭ J K L M N O Ò Ó P R S T U Ŭ Ù Ú V W X Y Z
a à á b c d e è é f g h i ì í ĭ j k l m n o ò ó p r s t u ŭ ù ú v w x y z

%{a%}:a %{a%}:á %{a%}:à %{a%}:0  
%{e%}:e %{e%}:é %{e%}:è %{e%}:0
%{i%}:i %{i%}:í %{i%}:ì %{i%}:ĭ %{i%}:0
%{o%}:o %{o%}:0
%{u%}:u %{u%}:0
%{ó%}:ó %{ó%}:0 %{ó%}:́
%{O%}:o %{O%}:0
%{AE%}:a %{AE%}:e
%{ù%}:ù %{ù%}:u %{ù%}:0
%{ŭ%}:ŭ %{ŭ%}:u
%{ú%}:ú %{ú%}:u

%{U%}:u %{U%}:a %{U%}:à %{U%}:ŭ %{U%}:0
%{I%}:u %{I%}:i %{I%}:ú %{I%}:w %{I%}:0
%{t%}:t %{t%}:d %{t%}:0
%{P%}:p %{P%}:b

%{N%}:n %{N%}:m
%{n%}:n %{n%}:0
%{h%}:h %{h%}:0
%{k%}:k %{k%}:0
%{l%}:l %{l%}:0
%{m%}:m %{m%}:0
%{w%}:w %{w%}:0
%{y%}:y %{y%}:0
%{W%}:w %{W%}:o 
%{A%}:a %{A%}:o 
%{ʍ%}:w %{ʍ%}:0
%{Z%}:w %{Z%}:0 ! for w endings

%{'%}:0 %{'%}:́

%>:0
;

Sets

Vowel = A À Á E È É I Ì Í O Ò Ó U Ŭ Ù Ú 
        %{a%} a à á e è é i ì í o ò ó u ŭ ù ú ;

Consonant = B C D F G H J K L M N P R S T V W X Y Z
            b c d f g h j k l m n p r s t v w x y z ;

Rules

! Rules to shift accent for plurals
"Accent is placed in the penultimate vowel"
%{'%}:́  <=> _ [ :Vowel* :Consonant+ :Vowel+ :Consonant* ]/[ :0 ]* .#. ;

! Rule to add 'w' to end of 'shaa' when followed by word that starts with vowel

! Rules to make (nu)-(pa) contract to (mbà-)
"N is realized as m when the possessive prefix nu precedes pa"
%{N%}:m <=> _ :0* p: Vowel: ;

"N is realized as 0 when the possessive prefix nu precedes pa"
%{N%}:0 <=>  _ %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: n: Vowel: ;

!"P is realized as b when the possessive prefix nu precedes pa"
!p:b <=> %{N%}: :0* _ Vowel: ;

"k is realized as g when the subject prefix nu precedes ka"
Cx:Cy <=> %{N%}: %{t%}: %{U%}: :0* _ ( h: | %{ʍ%}: | [ %{ù%}: p: ] ) [ %{ù%}: | Vowel: ] ;
        where Cx in ( p k t s )
              Cy in ( b g d z )
        matched ;

"a is realized as à when the possessive prefix nu precedes pa"
%{'%}:̀  <=> [%{N%}: | k: | w: ] %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: p: a: _ ;
                except
                 _ [ :Vowel* :Consonant+ :Vowel+ :Consonant* ]/[ :0 ]* .#. ;

! Additional rule to make (ku)-(pa) contract to (kpà-) and (wu)-(pa) contract to (pà-)
"u is not realized when the possessive prefix ku or wu precedes pa"
%{U%}:0 <=> [ w: | %{w%}: ] ( %{t%}: ) _ %>: [ p: | m: | k: | s: ] ( h: | %{ʍ%}: | [ %{ù%}: p: ]  ) Vowel: ;
        [ k: | %{k%}: ] %{t%}: _ %>: [ p: | k: | s: | n: ] ( h: | %{ʍ%}: | [ %{ù%}: p: ] ) Vowel: ;
        %{N%}: %{t%}: _ %>: [ p: | k: | s: | n: ] ( h: | %{ʍ%}: | [ %{ù%}: p: ] ) Vowel: ;
        _ %>: Vowel: ;
        _ %>: k: %{ʍ%}: %{ù%}: ; ! for kwuphamun
                except 
                       %{w%}: %{t%}: _ %>: m: u: ; ! for verb drink



"t realized when followed by -ah"
!%{t%}:0 <=> _ %{U%}: %>: \Vowel: ;
%{t%}:Cy <=> Cx: _ %{U%}: %>: a: [ h: | l: ] ;
             Cx: _ %{U%}: %>: l: ŭ: ;   ! verb lŭnúm
                where Cx in ( %{N%} %{k%}  k  w %{w%} )
                      Cy in ( d       t   t  t    t ) 
                matched ;


! Tree rule
!"N is realized as n when the possessive prefix nu precedes mi"
!%{N%}:n <=> _ %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: m: Vowel: ;

"k realized as 0 when ku precedes stem that starts with k"
%{k%}:0 <=> _ %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: k: ( [ %{ʍ%}: | %{ù%}: p: ] ) [ %{ù%}: | Vowel: ] ;

"w not realized when (wu) + (mi)"
w:0 <=> _ ( %{t%}: ) [ u: | %{U%}: ] %>: m: Vowel: ;
        except
             _ %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: a: h: ;  

"%{w%} not realized when (wu) + (mi)"
%{w%}:0 <=> _ ( %{t%}: ) [ u: | %{U%}: ] %>: [ m: | p: | w: ] Vowel: ;
            _ ( %{t%}: ) [ u: | %{U%}: ] %>: k: %{ʍ%}: ;
        except
             _ %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: a: h: ;  
             _ %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: m: u: ; ! for verb 'drink'

"u goes to ŭ when (ku) or (nu) + (mi)"
%{U%}:ŭ <=> k: %{t%}: _ %>: m: Vowel: ;
        %{N%}: %{t%}: _ %>: m: Vowel: ;

!"i is realized as ì when the possessive prefix precedes mi"
!i:í <=> %{N%}: %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: m: _ ;
!       k: %{t%}: %{U%}: %>: m: _ ;

"u is not realized if there is any number of consonants followed by a morpheme boundary followed by a vowel"
%{u%}:0 <=> _ :Consonant+ %>: :Vowel ;
            :Vowel %>: _ ;
           except
               :0* m: %>: _ n: %>: :Vowel ; ! for ngataatamunal etc.

"Stems ending in -xiin drop the final n when an imperative ending is added"
n:0 <=> :x :i :i _ %>: %{l%}: :0*;
        :x :i :i _ %>: %{o%}: %{o%}: k w ;

"Realize -oo when stem ends in consonant"
%{o%}:o <=> :Consonant %>: _ ;
            :Consonant %>: %{o%}: _ ;

"ʍ realized as w when w prefix"
%{ʍ%}:w <=> %{w%}: :* _ ;
            k: _ {ù}: p: :0* ;     


! Pair Tests
!@ {N}:n {t}:0 {U}:ŭ >:0 m:m i:i h:h t:t {u}:0 k:k w:w 


! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
